src/filters/reorder-tags.otw.xfscript
define rmPersNum [
                [
                %+Pl | 
                %+1 |
                %+2 |
                %+3 |
                %+X |
                1%+ |
                2%+ |
                3%+ |
                X%+ |
                %+1Sg | 
                %+2Sg  | 
                %+3Sg  |
                %+%0Sg |
                %+21Pl |
                %+3Pl  |
                %+3Pl  |
                %+4Sg  | !VIIs
                %+4Pl  | !VIIs
                %+4    |
                %+2Pl  |
                %+1Pl  |
                %+%0Pl 
                ] -> 0 || _ \[.#.|%+Thm] ] ; 

define PLPl [%+PL -> %+Pl] ; 

define rmArg [ [%+ONE|%+TWO|%+ARGSLOT|%+Thm|"^X$"] -> 0 ] ;
!} clean end

!} persnum end

read regex [
    nounobv   .o.
    nounpl    .o.
    nounsg    .o.
    nounpos   .o.
    mkind     .o.
    mkpos     .o.
    sdneu     .o.
    rmneu     .o.
    rmdum     .o.
    !neuprtdub .o.
    !mkneu     .o.
    !num flag intro
    sdX       .o.
    sd21      .o.
    sd1pl     .o.
    sd2pl     .o.
    sd3pl     .o.
    sd3obv    .o.
    sdinanpl  .o.
    sdinansg  .o.
    sd1       .o.
    sd2       .o.
    sd3       .o.
    !!general copying
    argcount .o.
    onetwo      .o.
    argslot     .o.
    cpsub     .o.
    !!vti copying
    sdthminan .o.
    mvthminan .o.
    objinan   .o.
    subvti    .o.
    !theme flag intro
    sdcnjthm1  .o.
    sdcnjthm2a .o.
    sdcnjthm2b .o.
    sdcnjthmNul .o.
    sdcnjdouble .o.
    sdthm2   .o.
    sdthm1sg  .o.
    sdthm1pl  .o.
    sdthmdir  .o.
    sdthminv  .o.
    sdthmpas  .o.
    !!copy theme to end
    cpthm    .o. 
    !theme arguments
    thm2vta   .o. 
    cpthmdirpre .o.
    1Sgv2     .o.
    1Plv2     .o.
    3vN       .o.
    XPass     .o.
    Inaninv   .o. 
    rmInan    .o.
        !cnj
    thmdirc   .o.
    thm2b     .o.
    thm1plc   .o.
    thmInvNegSpec .o.
    InanvN    .o.
    cpSubthm1 .o.
    cpSubthm2a .o.
    cpSubthmNul .o.
    !object filling
    cp3Objvta .o.
    cp1Objvta .o.
    cp2Objvta .o.
    Nv3       .o.
    Nv1       .o.
    Nv2       .o.
    Nv3cnj    .o.
    cpInvObjcnj  .o.
    !cash out num flags
    fs1plvtaloc .o. 
    2plopt      .o.
    2ploptcnj   .o.    
    fs2plvtaloc .o. 
    fs3plv3vta  .o.
    fs3obvv3vta .o.
    fs3plvta    .o.
    fs21pl      .o.
    fs2pl       .o.
    fs3pla      .o.
    fs3pl       .o.
    fs1pl       .o.
    fsinanpl    .o.
    !clean up
    chThm       .o.
    chO         .o.
    chP         .o.
    rmPersNum   .o.
    PLPl        .o.
    rmArg
];

invert net
